languages/apertium-gla/apertium-gla.gla.dix
    <pardef n="bh/o__pr">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uam</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uat</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uaithe</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uaipe</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uainn</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uaibh</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uapa</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ri__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>um</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ut</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>the</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nn</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bh</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>utha</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tha/r__pr">
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ram</l><r>r<s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rad</l><r>r<s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iris</l><r>r<s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>irte</l><r>r<s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rainn</l><r>r<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raibh</l><r>r<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rtha</l><r>r<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="mi__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>se</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tu__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sa</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="thu__prn">
      <e><par n="tu__prn"/><p><l></l><r><s n="len"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>san</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="i__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>se</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sinn__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sibh__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>se</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="iad__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>san</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dè__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fhèin__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->


    <pardef n="/an__det">
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>a'</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>a'</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>na</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>na</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>nan</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nam</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>a'</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>a'</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>na</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>na</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>na</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>nan</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nam</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/mo__pos">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mo</l><r>mo<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>m'</l><r>mo<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>mo</l><r>mo<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bho"><i>bh</i><par n="bh/o__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bho" r="LR"><p><l></l><r>bh</r></p><par n="bh/o__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ri"><i>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="thar"><i>tha</i><par n="tha/r__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ceangailte ri"><i>ceangailte<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="an coimeas ri"><i>an<b/>ciomeas<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="coltach ri"><i>coltach<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="còmhla ri"><i>còmhla<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="cuide ri"><i>cuide<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="làmh ri"><i>làmh<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="maille ri"><i>maille<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="suas ri"><i>suas<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="an taca ri"><i>an<b/>taca<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="taobh ri"><i>taobh<b/>ri</i><par n="ri__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mi"><i>mi</i><par n="mi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><i>tu</i><par n="tu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tu"><p><l>thu</l><r>tu</r></p><par n="thu__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="e__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="i__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sinn"><i>sinn</i><par n="sinn__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sibh"><i>sibh</i><par n="sibh__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="iad"><i>iad</i><par n="iad__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dè"><i>dè</i><par n="dè__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cò"><i>cò</i><par n="dè__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="fhèin"><i>fhèin</i><par n="fhèin__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><i></i><par n="/an__det"/></e>
    <e lm="mo"><i></i><par n="/mo__pos"/></e>
